Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.310

Other reporting service not precluded.

Nothing in this act or any other act or parts of acts or court rule shall be construed to preclude such official reporter from performing other and additional reporting service at any time when such service can be performed without conflict with or prejudice to the duties of the official reporter.

[ 1943 c 69 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 42-14.]